Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1064.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1501 of Title 60, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section:
1. "Hedge fund" means a lawfully organized business entity,
including but not limited to a general partnership, limited
partnership, limited liability partnership, corporation, limited
liability company or other entity that accumulates capital in excess
of One Hundred Million Dollars ($100,000,000.00) primarily for the
Req. No. 16277 Page 1

purp ose of investing such capital in equity securities of for profit
business enterprises, in any form, with the objective of achieving
high rates of return for the investors of the hedge fund;
2. "Hedge fund" does not mean a private or public pension fund,
an insurance company, banks or other federally or state-regulated
financial institutions, the primary business activity of which does
not consist of equity investing, or any other business enterprise,
the principal purpose of which is something other than investment of
accumulated or invested capital in the equity securities or
derivatives of equity securities of a for profit business
enterprise;
3. For purposes of this section, if a lawfully recognized
business entity is exempt from federal securities regulation
pursuant to Regulation D of the United States Securities and
Exchange Commission, there shall be a rebuttable presumption that
such entity is a hedge fund within the meaning of this section; and
4. The capitalization requirement of One Hundred Million
Dollars ($100,000,000.00) prescribed by paragraph 1 of this
subsection shall be measured as the median value for all assets
under management by the fund during the period of time used by the
fund to report asset values to its equity owners or to any
regulatory entity of the federal government or state government.
B. No hedge fund shall acquire title to single family
residential property located within the state.
Req. No. 16277 Page 2

C. No subsidiary of a hedge fund shall acquire title to single
family residential property located within the state.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-16277 MAH 02/23/26



















Req. No. 16277 Page 3